Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 2. Formation.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limited Liability Companies, §§ 3-7, 29, 35, 38, 44, 45, 50.

§ 13.1-1008.
Purposes.

Every limited liability company formed under this chapter has the purpose of engaging in any lawful business, purpose, or activity, whether or not such business, purpose, or activity is carried on for profit, except as otherwise provided by the law of this Commonwealth, unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of organization.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1992, c. 574; 2002, c. 288; 2004, c. 601.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 288 inserted “whether or not such business is carried on for profit.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 twice inserted “purpose, or activity” following “business.”

§ 13.1-1009.
Powers.

Unless the articles of organization provide otherwise, every limited liability company has perpetual duration and succession in its name and has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including, without limitation, power:

To sue and be sued, complain and defend in its name;

To purchase, receive, lease or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

To purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any other person;

To make contracts and guaranties, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises or income;

To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

To conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter within or without this Commonwealth;

To elect and appoint managers, employees and agents of the limited liability company, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, and benefit and incentive plans for all or any of the current or former managers, members, employees, and agents of the limited liability company or any of its subsidiaries;

To make donations to the public welfare or for religious, charitable, scientific, literary or educational purposes;

To make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with this section or any other applicable law, that furthers the business and affairs of the limited liability company;

To pay compensation, or to pay additional compensation to any or all managers, members, and employees on account of services previously rendered to the limited liability company, whether or not an agreement to pay such compensation was made before such services were rendered;

To insure for its benefit the life of any of its managers, members, or employees, to insure the life of any member for the purpose of acquiring at his death the interest owned by such member and to continue such insurance after the relationship terminates;

To cease its activities, wind up its affairs, and proceed to cancel its existence;

To enter into partnership agreements, joint ventures, or other associations of any kind with any person or persons;

Subject to such standards and restrictions, if any, as are set forth in its articles of organization or an operating agreement, to indemnify and hold harmless any member or manager or other person from and against any and all claims and demands whatsoever, and to pay for or reimburse any member or manager or other person for reasonable expenses incurred by such a person who is a party to a proceeding in advance of final disposition of the proceeding;

To transact any lawful business that a corporation, partnership, or other business entity may conduct under the laws of the Commonwealth subject, however, to any and all laws and restrictions that govern or limit the conduct of such activity by such corporation, partnership or other business entity; and

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the limited liability company is organized.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2004, c. 601; 2006, c. 912; 2008, c. 108; 2013, c. 17.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 601 rewrote subdivision 16, which read: “To indemnify a member or manager or any other person to the same extent as a corporation may indemnify any of the directors, officers, employees, or agents of the corporation.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912 added the language beginning “and to pay for or reimburse any member” to the end of subdivision 16.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 108, effective April 1, 2009, rewrote subdivision 14, which read:
“To cease its activities and cancel its certificate of organization.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 17 inserted “has perpetual duration and succession in its name and” in the introductory language.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

For survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 39 (2013).

§ 13.1-1010.
Organizers.

One or more persons may act as organizers of a limited liability company by signing and delivering articles of organization to the Commission for filing. An organizer need not be a member of the limited liability company after formation has occurred.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2006, c. 748; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 748 substituted “act as organizers of” for “form” in the first sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288 substituted “delivering articles of organization to the Commission for filing. An organizer need not be a member” for “filing articles of organization with the Commission. Such person or persons need not be members.”

Law Review.

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

§§ 13.1-1010.1 through 13.1-1010.4.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-1010.1

, conversion of partnership to limited liability company, derived from Acts 1992, c. 574; 1993, c. 113; 1996, c. 265; 1997, c. 190; 1998, c. 432; 2002, c. 608; 2006, c. 912; 2013, c. 17. Former § 13.1-1010.2, effect of conversion; entity unchanged, derived from Acts 1993, c. 113; 1997, c. 190. Former § 13.1-1010.3, domestication of non-United States entities, derived from Acts 1997, c. 190; 2000, c. 581; 2005, c. 255; 2006, c. 912. Former § 13.1-1010.4, conversions involving corporations and limited liability companies, derived from Acts 2003, c. 340.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

§ 13.1-1011.
Articles of organization.

The articles of organization shall set forth:

A name for the limited liability company that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-1012

;

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the limited liability company’s initial registered office, the name of the city or county in which it is located, the name of its initial registered agent at that office, and that the agent is either (i) an individual who is a resident of Virginia and one of the following: a member or manager of the limited liability company, a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, an officer or director of a corporation that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, a general partner of a general or limited partnership that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, a trustee of a trust that is a member or manager of the limited liability company, or a member of the Virginia State Bar or (ii) a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company or registered limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth; and

The post office address, including the street and number, if any, of the principal office of the limited liability company, which may be the same as the registered office, but need not be within the Commonwealth.

The articles of organization may set forth any other matter that under this chapter is permitted to be set forth in an operating agreement of a limited liability company.

The articles of organization need not set forth any of the powers enumerated in this chapter.

If the Commission finds that the articles of organization comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of organization.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1992, c. 574; 1993, c. 113; 1997, c. 190; 2000, c. 162; 2001, cc. 517, 541; 2004, c. 314; 2006, c. 748; 2009, c. 763.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 162, in subdivision A 2 (ii), deleted “or” following “professional corporation,” inserted “or registered limited liability partnership” and inserted “with the Virginia State Bar” thereafter.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 517 and 541 are identical, and in subdivision A 2, inserted “an individual who is” and “an officer or director of a corporation . . . member or manager of the limited liability company,” substituted “a domestic or foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company” for “a professional corporation, professional limited liability company” and “authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth” for “registered with the Virginia State Bar under §

54.1-3902

.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 314 substituted “post office address” for “post-office address” in subdivisions A 2 and A 3; inserted “a member or manager of the limited liability company, a member or manager of a limited liability company that is a member or manager of the limited liability company” in clause (i) of subdivision A 2; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 748 added subsection D.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 763 substituted “one of the following” for “either” in clause (i) of subdivision A 2.

Law Review.

For article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

§ 13.1-1011.1.
Articles of correction.

A limited liability company may correct its articles of organization at any time to correct a name or address specified in the articles of organization that was inadvertently or improperly set forth.

For a correction to the articles of organization of a limited liability company to be adopted, the correction shall be adopted by a majority vote of the managers, provided that if the limited liability company has been formed without any managers and no managers have been appointed, the correction may be adopted by a majority vote of the members entitled to vote thereon, unless the articles of organization require a greater vote, provided that if the limited liability company has been formed without any managers or members and no members have been admitted, a correction may be adopted by a majority vote of the organizers of the limited liability company.

To correct its articles of organization, a limited liability company shall file with the Commission articles of correction setting forth:

The name of the limited liability company;

The text of each correction;

A statement of the nature of the error necessitating each correction; and

A statement of the manner in which the correction was adopted.If the Commission finds that the articles of correction comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of correction.

History.

1998, c. 432; 2003, c. 379; 2006, c. 748.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 379, in subsection A, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “A certificate of correction shall not be required to be adopted by a vote of the members of the limited liability company”; inserted present subsection B; redesignated former subsection B as present subsection C; in present subsection C, substituted “articles” for “a certificate”; deleted “and” at the end of subdivision C 1; added subdivisions C 3 and C 4; and in the paragraph of subsection C following subdivision C 4, substituted “the articles” for “a certificate” and “comply” for “complies.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 748 added “that was inadvertently or improperly set forth” to the end of subsection A; and in subsection B, substituted “organizers of” for “persons who formed” and deleted “under §

13.1-1010

” from the end.

§ 13.1-1012.
Name.

A limited liability company name shall contain the words “limited company” or “limited liability company” or their abbreviations “L.C.,” “LC,” “L.L.C.,” or “LLC.”

A limited liability company name shall not contain:

Any word, abbreviation, or combination of characters that states or implies the limited liability company is a corporation, a limited partnership, a registered limited liability partnership, or a protected series of a series limited liability company; or

Any word or phrase the use of which is prohibited by law for such company.

Except as authorized by subsection D, a limited liability company name shall be distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from:

The name of a domestic limited liability company or a foreign limited liability company registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A limited liability company name reserved under §

13.1-1013

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited liability company because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of any corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, existing under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A corporate name reserved or registered under §

13.1-631

,

13.1-632

,

13.1-830

or

13.1-831

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign corporation, whether issuing shares or not issuing shares, because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic business trust or a foreign business trust registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A business trust name reserved under §

13.1-1215

;

The designated name adopted by a foreign business trust because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth;

The name of a domestic limited partnership or a foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A limited partnership name reserved under §

50-73.3

; and

The designated name adopted by a foreign limited partnership because its real name is unavailable for use in the Commonwealth.

A domestic limited liability company may apply to the Commission for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon its records from one or more of the names described in subsection C. The Commission shall authorize use of the name applied for if the other entity consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking in form satisfactory to the Commission to change its name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission from the name of the applying limited liability company.

The use of assumed names or fictitious names, as provided for in Chapter 5 (§ 59.1-69 et seq.) of Title 59.1, is not affected by this chapter.

The Commission, in determining whether a limited liability company name is distinguishable upon its records from the name of any of the business entities listed in subsection C, shall not consider any word, phrase, abbreviation, or designation required or permitted under this section and §

13.1-544.1

, subsection A of §

13.1-630

, §

13.1-1104

, subsection A of §

50-73.2

, and subdivision A 2 of §

50-73.78

to be contained in the name of a business entity formed or organized under the laws of the Commonwealth or authorized or registered to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1992, c. 574; 1995, c. 168; 2003, cc. 340, 592; 2005, c. 379; 2012, c. 63; 2019, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 636, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 636, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision B 1, inserted “or a protected series of a series limited liability company”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “a registered limited liability partnership” in subdivision B 1. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

§ 13.1-1013.
Reserved name.

A person may apply to the Commission to reserve the exclusive use of a limited liability company name, including a designated name for a foreign limited liability company. The limited liability company name applied for need not comply with subsection A of §

13.1-1012

. If the Commission finds that the limited liability company name applied for is distinguishable upon the records of the Commission, it shall reserve the name for the applicant’s exclusive use for a 120-day period.

The owner of a reserved limited liability company name may renew the reservation for successive periods of 120 days each by filing with the Commission, during the 45-day period preceding the date of expiration of the reservation, a renewal application.

The owner of a reserved limited liability company name may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the Commission a notice of the transfer, signed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved, and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

A reserved limited liability company name may be used by its owner in connection with (i) the formation or an amendment to change the name of a domestic stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; (ii) an application for a certificate of authority or registration to transact business in the Commonwealth as a foreign stock or nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; or (iii) an amended application for such authority or registration, provided that the proposed name complies with the provisions of §

13.1-630

,

13.1-762

,

13.1-829

,

13.1-924

,

13.1-1012

,

13.1-1054

,

13.1-1214

,

13.1-1244

,

50-73.2

, or

50-73.56

, as the case may be.

History.

1991, c. 168; 2006, c. 505; 2015, c. 444.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 505 added the language beginning “by filing with” in subsection B.

§ 13.1-1014.
Amendment of articles of organization.

A limited liability company may amend its articles of organization at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles, or to delete a provision not required in the articles. An amendment to the articles of organization may delete the name and address of the registered agent or registered office, or the address of the principal office, if a statement of change described in §

13.1-1016

or

13.1-1018.1

, as the case may be, is on file with the Commission.

For an amendment to the articles of organization of a limited liability company to be adopted, the amendment shall be approved by that number or percentage of members required to amend an operating agreement, unless the articles of organization or a written operating agreement otherwise provide, provided that if the limited liability company has been formed without any members and no members have been admitted, an amendment may be adopted by a majority of the persons named as a manager in the articles of organization or, if there are no members or managers, by a majority of the organizers of the limited liability company.

To amend its articles of organization, a limited liability company shall file with the Commission articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the limited liability company;

The text of each amendment adopted;

The date of each amendment’s adoption; and

A statement that the amendment was adopted by a vote of the members, by the managers or by the organizers in accordance with this chapter, as the case may be.If the Commission finds that the articles of amendment comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of amendment.

An amendment to articles of organization does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the limited liability company, a proceeding to which the limited liability company is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than members of the limited liability company. An amendment changing a limited liability company’s name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the limited liability company in its former name.

A member of a limited liability company does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision of the articles of organization.

History.

1991, c. 168; 1997, c. 190; 2001, c. 548; 2005, c. 255; 2006, cc. 748, 912; 2008, c. 108; 2013, c. 17.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 548, added the language beginning “provided that if the limited . . .” in subsection B; substituted “restated articles” for “restate articles” in subdivision C 2; and inserted “or by the persons who formed the limited liability company” in subdivision C 4.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 255 deleted “or to restate the articles” at the end of subsection A, inserted “the persons named as a manager in the articles of organization or, if there are no members or managers, by” following “adopted by” in subsection B, deleted “or, if the amendments are a restatement of the articles of organization, restated articles of organization” at the end of subdivision C 2, inserted “by the managers” in subdivision C 4, deleted the last sentence in the last paragraph of subsection C which read:
“If the articles of amendment contain a restatement of the articles of organization, the restated articles of organization supersede the original articles of organization and all prior amendments to them,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 748, in subsection B, inserted “a majority of” in two places, substituted “organizers of” for “persons who formed,” and deleted “under §

13.1-1010

” from the end.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912, in subsection B, inserted “by that number or percentage of members required to amend an operating agreement” and substituted “or a written operating agreement otherwise provide” for “require a greater vote, by a majority vote of the members entitled to vote thereon.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 108, effective April 1, 2009, added the last sentence in subsection A; and in subdivision C 4, substituted “organizers” for
“the persons who formed the limited liability company” and added “as the case may be.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 17, in the second sentence of subsection A, deleted “initial” preceding “registered agent” and inserted “or the address of the principal office,” and “or

13.1-1018.1

, as the case may be.”

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

§ 13.1-1014.1.
Restatement of articles of organization.

A limited liability company may restate its articles of organization at any time.

The restatement may include one or more amendments to the articles of organization, including an amendment to delete the name and address of the registered agent or registered office, or the address of the principal office, if a statement of change described in §

13.1-1016

or

13.1-1018.1

, as the case may be, is on file with the Commission.

For a restatement of the articles of organization of a limited liability company to be adopted, the restatement shall be approved by that number or percentage of members required to amend an operating agreement, unless the articles of organization or a written operating agreement otherwise provide, provided that if the limited liability company has been formed without any members and no members have been admitted, a restatement may be adopted by a majority of the persons named as a manager in the articles of organization or, if there are no members or managers, by a majority of the organizers of the limited liability company.

A limited liability company restating its articles of organization shall file with the Commission articles of restatement setting forth:

The name of the limited liability company immediately prior to restatement;

Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles of organization;

The text of the restated articles of organization or amended and restated articles of organization;

The date of adoption of the articles of restatement; and

A statement that the restatement was adopted by a vote of the members, by the managers or by the organizers in accordance with this chapter, as the case may be.

If the Commission finds that the articles of restatement comply with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of restatement. When the certificate of restatement is effective, the restated articles of organization or amended and restated articles of organization supersede the original articles of organization and all amendments to the original articles of organization.

The Commission may certify restated articles of organization or amended and restated articles of organization as the articles of organization currently in effect.

History.

2005, c. 255; 2006, cc. 748, 912; 2008, c. 108; 2013, c. 17.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 748, in subsection C, inserted “a majority of” in two places, substituted “organizers of” for “persons who formed,” and deleted “under §

13.1-1010

” from the end; and deleted “or amendments” after “an amendment” in subdivision D 3.

The 2006 amendment by c. 912, in subsection C, inserted “by that number or percentage of members required to amend an operating agreement” and substituted “or a written operating agreement otherwise provide” for “require a greater vote, by a majority vote of the members entitled to vote thereon.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 108, effective April 1, 2009, rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 17 deleted “initial” preceding “registered agent” and inserted “or the address of the principal office,” and “or

13.1-1018.1

, as the case may be,” in subsection B.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).